Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1069
License; when required; temporary practitioner; license.

A license as a temporary practitioner shall be required before any person may act as a temporary practitioner, and no person shall assume any title indicative of being a temporary practitioner without first being so licensed by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 59;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 22;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-398;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 331;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 20.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.